Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 3

Public Buildings and Other Facilities

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

[Reserved.]

Subchapter 2

— Capitol Building and Grounds Generally

Cross References.

Distribution among funds, §19-5-201 et seq.

Preambles.

Acts 1935, No. 59, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, public convenience requires that a restaurant or cafe be conducted in the State Capitol Building under proper supervision as to sanitation and personnel; and

“Whereas, no provision of law now authorizes or directs the custodian of the properties to enter into an agreement based upon a monetary consideration; and

“Whereas, under present arrangements the state is paying the cost of light, gas, water, etc., utilized in the operation of said cafe or restaurant, which represents a net loss;

“Now therefore ….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1907, No. 310, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1911, No. 22, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1917, No. 150, § 6: Mar. 1, 1917. Emergency declared.

Acts 1919, No. 323, § 6: Mar. 21, 1919. Emergency declared.

Acts 1935, No. 59, § 2: approved Feb. 20, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “It is found as a matter of fact that the lack of legal authority to receive bids as herein contemplated is resulting in the loss of revenue approximating more than $100 per month, and this act being necessary for the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act shall take full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1939, No. 67, § 4: approved Feb. 9, 1939. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the State of Arkansas has gone to considerable expense to improve the physical condition of the House and Senate Chambers, and whereas, the use of the House and Senate Chambers for any and all purposes will result in a substantial impairment of the physical improvements made by the State of Arkansas, now therefore, an emergency is hereby declared and this act being necessary for the preservation of state property and for the peace, health and safety of the state shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1963, No. 507, § 9: Mar. 20, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the General Assembly that there is an acute shortage of parking facilities on the State Capitol Grounds, that said shortage of parking facilities, together with inadequate traffic control, adversely affects the proper operation of the State Government in that people having business with the state do not have easy access to the several state offices, departments and agencies, that existing law has failed to solve the aforesaid problems, that such condition should be remedied at the earliest possible time, and that only by the immediate operation of this act may such condition be alleviated. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force on and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 56, § 5: Mar. 1, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain utility lines and facilities owned by the State of Arkansas and located on the State Capitol Grounds are no longer serviceable and that temporary facilities have been erected on the Grounds for providing services to the various buildings on the Grounds; that it is necessary that such temporary facilities be removed and that permanent facilities be installed as soon as possible in order that adequate service to the various state agencies on the Capitol Grounds may be provided; that there is presently no law specifically authorizing the state to enter into agreements with public utilities regarding the installation of utility lines and facilities on the Capitol Grounds and that this act is immediately necessary to grant such authority in order that utility services may be provided the various agencies and departments located on the Capitol Grounds. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 394, § 7: Mar. 10, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that many thousands of Arkansans served in the armed forces of the United States in Vietnam; that the Arkansas Vietnam veterans have not received the recognition and honor that they deserve for the service to their country in the Vietnam Conflict; that this act is designed to provide for the erection and maintenance of an appropriate monument on the State Capitol Grounds as soon as funds are made available therefor, as a symbol of recognition and appreciation of the state and its citizens to Arkansas Vietnam veterans; that this act should be given effect at the earliest possible date in order that interested persons may make contributions and donations to the Vietnam Veterans Monument Fund and thereby enable the Secretary of State to begin construction of the monument in the near future. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1068, § 21: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 24: Oct. 23, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law relating to the operation of interim committees of the General Assembly unduly restricts the interim work of the General Assembly by authorizing committees to meet only as joint committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate; that in order to enable the Senate and House of Representatives to efficiently and effectively perform their interim duties, it is necessary that the interim committees of each house be authorized to meet either jointly or separately and that this act should be given effect immediately to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1285, § 32: July 1, 1997, except § 10, effective Apr. 9, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-first General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety Section 10 of this act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, Section 10 shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, Section 10 shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto. The remaining sections of this act shall become effective from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2000 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2: Apr. 11, 2000. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that second-hand smoke is a detriment to the health of people who work in and visit the State Capitol Building as well as damaging to the building, its displays, and other contents; that this act will prohibit smoking in the State Capitol Building; and that this act should become effective as soon as possible in order to protect the health of people who work in and visit the State Capitol Building. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 526, § 2: Mar. 20, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is a critical need to ensure safe and secure public buildings and other facilities for the citizens of Arkansas on the grounds of the State Capitol; and that a delay in the effective date of this act could irreparably harm the ability of the Secretary of State to provide necessary upgrades and repairs to the grounds and facilities of the State Capitol. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

22-3-201. Lands adjacent to State Capitol to remain state property.

All of the lands belonging to the State of Arkansas adjacent to the State Capitol Building and commonly designated as the “New State Capitol tracts of land” shall forever be and remain the property of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1907, No. 310, § 1, p. 736; C. & M. Dig., § 9182; Pope's Dig., § 11868; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-201.

22-3-202. Secretary of State as custodian.

(a)

The Secretary of State is the constituted and legal custodian of the State Capitol Building, the grounds, and all the furniture and fixtures thereon and therein belonging to the state.

(b)

It is the duty of the Secretary of State to report to each General Assembly the condition of the State Capitol Building and of the grounds, furniture, and fixtures and to make recommendations relative to the maintenance of the building and grounds.

(c)

The Secretary of State may establish rental or other charges for the renting or leasing of property under an existing rental contract or lease to the Secretary of State as of January 1, 2013, within the State Capitol Building, the Capitol Hill Building, and the parking areas adjacent to the State Capitol Building and the Capitol Hill Building.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 150, § 2, p. 803; C. & M. Dig., § 4424; Pope's Dig., § 5455; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-202; Acts 2013, No. 1179, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (c).

22-3-203. Use of Senate and House Chambers — Definition.

(a)

It shall be unlawful to use the Senate and House Chambers of the State Capitol Building for any purpose except activities which are necessary for the operation of state government.

(b)

As used in this section, “activities” means those which the State of Arkansas controls and finances for all purposes.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 67, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-205.

Cross References.

Lieutenant Governor as custodian of Senate chamber, §25-16-301.

22-3-204. List of equipment in Senate and House Chambers.

(a)

At the close of each session of the General Assembly, the Secretary of the Senate shall furnish to the Secretary of State a complete list of all property and equipment in the Senate Chamber, and the Clerk of the House of Representatives shall furnish to the Secretary of State a complete list of all property and equipment in the House Chamber.

(b)

The Secretary of State shall, after checking the property, issue a receipt to the Secretary of the Senate for the property of the Senate and to the Clerk of the House of Representatives for the property of the House of Representatives placed in his or her custody.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 67, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-206.

Cross References.

Purchase of supplies for General Assembly, §10-2-222.

22-3-205. Leasing of restaurant or cafe in State Capitol Building.

(a)

As custodian of the State Capitol Building, the Secretary of State shall oversee the operation of and may receive bids or offers for renting or leasing the properties now being utilized for a restaurant or cafe and other purposes in the State Capitol Building upon such terms or conditions as, in the judgment of the Secretary of State, may best serve the interests of the state.

(b)

Moneys received under subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited into the cash funds, as defined by §19-4-801, of the Secretary of State that are designated for administrative and maintenance expenses.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 59, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 5456; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-207; Acts 2017, No. 526, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “As custodian of the State Capitol Building, the Secretary of State shall oversee the operation of and may” for “The Secretary of State, as custodian of the State Capitol Building, the Governor, and the Director of the Department of Health are directed to”, “for renting or leasing” for “the renting or leasing of”, and “the judgment of the Secretary of State” for “their judgment”; and, in (b), substituted “Moneys received under subsection (a) of this section” for “Moneys so received from these rentals” and “cash funds, as defined by §19-4-801, of the Secretary of State that are designated for administrative and maintenance expenses” for “State Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund, after which they shall be distributed among the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund and other funds as provided by law”.

22-3-206. Agreements with public utility companies.

(a)(1)

The Secretary of State, on behalf of the State of Arkansas, is authorized to enter into agreements with public utility companies regarding the installation, maintenance, and repair of utility service lines and facilities necessary to the delivery of the respective utility services to the various buildings on the State Capitol grounds.

(2)

The agreements may include the granting of easements or privileges to public utility companies to install and maintain lines and facilities on the State Capitol grounds and may contain provisions regarding the relative responsibilities of the public utility companies and the State of Arkansas for removing abandoned facilities or relocating lines and facilities on the State Capitol grounds, and may include such other agreements or provisions as shall be deemed appropriate or necessary by the parties.

(3)

No contract shall be entered into between the Secretary of State and any public utility until it is submitted to and approved as to form by the Attorney General.

(b)(1)

State agencies, departments, and institutions are authorized to enter into agreements with public utility companies for the furnishing of utility services by the contracting utility and the purchase of such services by the state agencies, departments, or institutions.

(2)

The agreements may include provisions regarding the service demand of the contracting agency, department, or institution for the utility service involved, the rates to be charged for the services, minimum charges, and such other matters as the contracting parties shall deem appropriate regarding the furnishing and purchase of utility services.

(3)

Any rates or charges established in the contracts shall conform to filings made with and approved by the appropriate state regulatory body.

History.

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 56, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-233, 5-234.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 56, § 1 provided:

“It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some of the utility service lines and facilities owned by the State of Arkansas and located on the State Capitol Grounds are no longer serviceable and that it is necessary that such facilities be replaced as soon as possible; it is further determined that other utility lines and facilities may need extensive repair or replacement in the future; that some public utilities are willing to install new lines, terminals and other facilities and equipment on the State Capitol Grounds for servicing the various buildings thereon but that there is currently no clear-cut authority for any public official or public body to grant authority for utilities to construct and maintain necessary facilities on the Capitol Grounds or to enter into agreements with such utilities regarding the establishment and maintenance of such facilities; that specific authority should be granted to the appropriate public official to enter into such agreements with public utilities in order that adequate utility services may be provided to various state agencies with offices in the buildings on the Capitol Grounds; that the Secretary of State is designated by law as custodian of the Capitol Building and Grounds and is the appropriate State official to be vested with the authority to contract with utilities on behalf of the State of Arkansas regarding the installation and maintenance of public utility facilities on the Capitol Grounds.”

22-3-207. Permanent press room.

(a)

Room 152 on the first floor of the State Capitol Building, immediately to the north of the north elevator on the first floor of the State Capitol Building, the same being to the north of the outside east entrance on the first floor of the State Capitol Building, is designated as a permanent press room to be used by newspaper, radio, and television personnel covering the State Capitol.

(b)

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to maintain the room at all times for the use of the press as provided in this section, and the Secretary of State shall provide necessary janitorial services and office equipment needed by members of the press in the room.

(c)

The Secretary of State is prohibited from changing the room number assigned to the room or to nullify or void the provisions of this section.

(d)

If the Secretary of State shall fail or refuse to comply with the provisions of this section, any resident of this state may bring an action in the Circuit Court of Pulaski County, Arkansas, for an appropriate order directing the Secretary of State to comply with the provisions of this section. Failure to comply with the order shall be contempt of court and punishable accordingly.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 80, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-231, 5-232.

22-3-208, 22-3-209. [Superseded.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

These sections, which concerned the State Capitol Grounds Commission, are deemed to be superseded by §22-3-501 et seq. The former sections were derived from the following sources:

22-3-208. Acts 1963, No. 507, §§ 1, 2, 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-225, 5-226, 5-228, 5-229.

22-3-209. Acts 1963, No. 507, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-230.

22-3-210. Trespassing upon State Capitol grounds.

(a)(1)

It shall be unlawful for any person to ride, drive, walk, go, or enter upon the public lawns or grounds belonging to the State of Arkansas whereon is located the State Capitol Building unless the person confines himself or herself to the public driveways or walkways upon the grounds.

(2)

However, this section shall not apply to the custodian of any state institutions or grounds, to any of his or her assistants, deputies, or employees, nor to any grounds laid out and designated by the custodian as playgrounds or public parks.

(b)

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Acts 1919, No. 323, §§ 1, 2; C. & M. Dig., §§ 9183, 9184; Pope's Dig., §§ 11869, 11870; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-211, 5-212; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 143.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (b).

Cross References.

Criminal trespass, §5-39-203.

22-3-211. Power of custodian to make arrests.

The custodian of any public building or grounds and his or her assistants and deputies are authorized and empowered to arrest any person whom they may see violating §22-3-210(a) and to take that person, when arrested, before any court of competent jurisdiction to be dealt with according to law.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 323, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 9185; Pope's Dig., § 11871; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-213.

22-3-212. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning skating in State Capitol Building with metal skates, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 561. The section was derived from Acts 1919, No. 323, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 9187; Pope's Dig., § 11873; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-215.

22-3-213. Fines paid into State Treasury.

All fines collected for the violation of §§22-3-210 and22-3-212 [repealed] shall be paid into the State Treasury and placed to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund, after which they shall be distributed among the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund and other funds as provided by law.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 323, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 9186; Pope's Dig., § 11872; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-214.

22-3-214. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Capitol Art Commission, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 1043, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1911, No. 22, §§ 1-3; C. & M. Dig., §§ 839-841; Pope's Dig., §§ 12096-12098; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-216 — 5-218; Acts 1987, No. 660, §§ 1-4. For present law, see §22-3-501 et seq.

22-3-215. Vietnam Veterans' Monument.

(a)

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that many thousands of Arkansans served in the United States Armed Forces in Vietnam, that Arkansas Vietnam veterans have not received the recognition and honor they deserve for the service to their country in the Vietnam War, and that an appropriate monument should be established and maintained on the State Capitol grounds as a symbol of the recognition and appreciation of the State of Arkansas to the Arkansas Vietnam veterans.

(b)

The Secretary of State is authorized and directed to cause to be constructed and maintained on the grounds of the State Capitol an appropriate monument to honor Arkansas Vietnam veterans when adequate funds for the construction thereof are deposited in the Vietnam Veterans' Monument Fund created in subsection (d) of this section.

(c)(1)

The Secretary of State shall designate four (4) Arkansas Vietnam veterans who, together with the Secretary of State, shall constitute the Vietnam Veterans' Monument Design Committee.

(2)

The committee shall meet at such times as it shall determine to be necessary to select a design and site for the Vietnam Veterans' Monument to be erected and maintained on the State Capitol grounds, which design and site shall be subject to the approval of the Capitol Zoning District Commission created by §22-3-303 or its successor.

(d)(1)

The Secretary of State is authorized to accept gifts, grants, and donations from individuals and organizations to be deposited as trust funds into the Vietnam Veteran's Monument Fund, which is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

(2)

All funds deposited into the fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting and maintaining a suitable monument on the State Capitol grounds in recognition and appreciation of Arkansas Vietnam veterans by the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 394, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-245 — 5-248.

22-3-216. Law Enforcement Officers' Memorial.

(a)

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that unfortunately several law enforcement officers have given their lives in the performance of their duties for the people of this state, and that these brave public servants should be honored. Therefore, an appropriate monument is established on the State Capitol grounds as a symbol of the recognition and appreciation of this state to these individuals.

(b)(1)

The Governor shall designate a representative from the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association, the Arkansas Fraternal Order of Police Foundation, Inc., and the Arkansas Municipal Police Association, who, together with a member of the State Capitol Police who is designated by the Secretary of State, shall constitute the Law Enforcement Officers' Memorial Design Committee.

(2)(A)

The committee shall meet at such times as it shall determine to be necessary to review names submitted for possible inclusion on the memorial.

(B)

The committee shall approve names to be included on the memorial and forward the names to the Secretary of State.

(3)

The committee shall meet as often as it deems necessary to review the design and layout of the existing memorial and make recommendations to the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission for the commission's consideration.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 964, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-257 — 5-260; Acts 2017, No. 625, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), inserted “Therefore” and substituted “is” for “should be”; deleted former (b) and (d) and redesignated former (c) as (b); inserted “a member of the State Capitol Police who is designated by” in (b)(1); substituted “review names submitted for possible inclusion on the memorial” for “select a design and site for the memorial to be erected and maintained on the State Capitol grounds. The design and site shall be subject to the approval of the Capitol Zoning District Commission created by §22-3-303 or its successor” in (b)(2)(A); added (b)(2)(B) and (b)(3); and made stylistic changes.

22-3-217. Rules — Management.

(a)(1)

Any rules or modifications concerning the use, management, or authorities of the Capitol Hill Building shall be reviewed and approved by the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities.

(2)

To this end, the management of the Capitol Hill Building shall be the joint responsibility of the Secretary of State and the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities.

(b)

Provided, however, it will be the continued responsibility of the Secretary of State to provide maintenance and upkeep of the Capitol Hill Building.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1068, § 14; 2019, No. 315, § 2346.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Former §22-3-217, concerning the management of the Capitol Hill Building, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 1075, § 18.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1).

22-3-218. Relocation — Vacant areas.

(a)

In the event an officer or agency relocates an office and related staff from or within the State Capitol Building at the request of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities and the officer or agency does not have an appropriation sufficient to pay the moving costs, rents, costs of making necessary modifications to rented space, or other costs associated with the move, the Bureau of Legislative Research may expend from appropriations authorized for the bureau such additional funds as may be required to assist such officer or agency in paying the additional costs.

(b)

When any area in the State Capitol Building is vacated, the Secretary of State and the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall jointly decide who shall occupy the vacated area.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1312, § 21; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 20; 1997, No. 267, § 1; 1997, No. 1285, § 18.

22-3-219. Monument to honor veterans of twentieth-century wars.

(a)

It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth Arkansas General Assembly that many thousands of Arkansans served in the armed services of the United States in World War I, World War II, the Korean Conflict, the Vietnam War, and, now, the War in the Persian Gulf, and that many of these veterans have not fully received the honors and recognition deserving of those citizens from a thankful state and nation and that an appropriate monument should be established on the State Capitol grounds as a symbol to honor those men and women who gave their lives and who served with honor in the military service of their nation during war.

(b)

The Secretary of State is hereby authorized and directed to cause to be constructed and maintained on the State Capitol grounds an appropriate monument to all the Arkansas veterans of the wars and military conflicts of the twentieth century after an appropriate design has been selected and when adequate funds for the construction thereof are deposited into the Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument Fund herein created.

(c)(1)

There is hereby created the Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument Design Selection Committee. The design selection committee shall consist of six (6) members designated as follows:

(A)

Five (5) members shall be Arkansas military war veterans from a war or conflict in the Twentieth Century and selected by the Secretary of State. He or she shall select at least one (1) member each representing the military war veterans of World War II, the Korean War, the Vietnam War, and the War in the Persian Gulf.

(B)

One (1) member shall be the Secretary of State or his or her designee.

(2)

The design selection committee shall meet at such times as it shall determine to be necessary to select a design and site for the Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument. The monument shall be of such size and design to provide for a specific place of honor for the Arkansas war veterans of each of the specific twentieth-century conflicts.

(3)

The design and site selection shall be subject to the approval of the Capitol Zoning District Commission created under §22-3-301 et seq.

(4)

The Secretary of State is hereby authorized to accept gifts, grants, and donations from individuals and organizations, to be deposited as trust funds into the Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument Fund which is hereby created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State. All funds deposited into the Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument Fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of constructing and erecting a monument in the memory and recognition of the military war veterans of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1159, §§ 1-4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was formerly codified as §§22-3-601 —22-3-604.

22-3-220. Smoking in State Capitol Building prohibited.

Any person smoking any cigarette, cigar, pipe, or other tobacco product in the State Capitol Building shall be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1323, § 1; 2000 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 144.

Amendments.

The 2000 amendment substituted “the State Capitol Building” for “the rotunda of the State Capitol Building or in the Governor's Conference Room, the Old Supreme Court Room, or the cafeteria in the State Capitol Building”.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor”.

22-3-221. Ten Commandments Monument Display Act.

(a)

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Ten Commandments Monument Display Act”.

(b)(1)

The Secretary of State shall permit and arrange for the placement on the State Capitol grounds of a suitable monument commemorating the Ten Commandments and containing the following text, which was displayed on the monument declared constitutional in Van Orden v. Perry, 545 U.S. 677 (2005):

“The Ten Commandments

I AM the LORD thy God.

Thou shalt have no other gods before me.

Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.

Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.

Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.

Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the land which the Lord thy God giveth thee.

Thou shalt not kill.

Thou shalt not commit adultery.

Thou shalt not steal.

Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.

Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's house.

Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's wife, nor his manservant, nor his maidservant, nor his cattle, nor anything that is thy neighbor's.”.

(2)(A)

The Secretary of State shall arrange for the monument to be designed, constructed, and placed on the State Capitol grounds by private entities at no expense to the State of Arkansas.

(B)

The monument shall be placed on the State Capitol grounds where there are other monuments.

(3)

The Secretary of State shall:

(A)

Approve the design and site selection for the monument under this subsection; and

(B)

Arrange a suitable time for its placement.

(4)(A)

Before approving the design and site selection for the monument under this subsection, the Secretary of State shall consult the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission and obtain the commission's views on design and site selection.

(B)

The monument under this subsection shall be exempt from §22-3-301 et seq. and §22-3-501 et seq.

(c)

In the event that the legality or constitutionality of the monument under subsection (b) of this section is challenged in a court of law, the Attorney General may:

(1)

Prepare and present a legal defense of the monument; or

(2)(A)

Request that Liberty Legal Institute prepare and present a legal defense of the monument.

(B)

A request that Liberty Legal Institute prepare and present a legal defense of the monument shall not be subject to §25-16-702.

(d)

The placement of the monument under this section shall not be construed to mean that the State of Arkansas favors any particular religion or denomination over others.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1231, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, No. 1231, § 1, provided: “LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The Ten Commandments, found in the Bible at Exodus 20:1-17 and Deuteronomy 5:6-21, are an important component of the moral foundation of the laws and legal system of the United States of America and of the State of Arkansas;

“(2)

The courts of the United States of America and of various states frequently cite the Ten Commandments in published decisions;

“(3)

The Ten Commandments represent a philosophy of government held by many of the founders of this nation and by many Arkansans and other Americans today, that God has ordained civil government and has delegated limited authority to civil government, that God has limited the authority of civil government, and that God has endowed people with certain unalienable rights, including life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness;

“(4)

In order that they may understand and appreciate the basic principles of the American system of government, the people of the United States of America and of the State of Arkansas need to identify the Ten Commandments, one of many sources, as influencing the development of what has become modern law; and

“(5)

The placing of a monument to the Ten Commandments on the grounds of the Arkansas State Capitol would help the people of the United States and of the State of Arkansas to know the Ten Commandments as the moral foundation of the law.”

22-3-222. Gold Star Family Memorial Monument Act.

(a)

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Gold Star Family Memorial Monument Act”.

(b)(1)

The Secretary of State shall permit and arrange for the placement on the State Capitol grounds of a monument commemorating Gold Star Families and containing the following text, or text similar to the following text, on an explanatory marker to be placed near or adjacent to the monument that explains the meaning of the monument:

“This monument is in tribute to and honors the families who have had a loved one who died while serving in the United States Armed Forces.

The first scene depicts their homeland: the United States of America.

The next scene is a father and a mother with a newborn baby: the families of our fallen heroes.

The next scene indicates the youth of the United States who volunteer to serve and protect us and give others a freedom they never knew.

The cutout of the missing person represents the sacrifice of life for peace and freedom.

The last scene depicts the families grieving the loss of loved ones who sacrificed their lives to preserve our rights, liberties, and the United States flag under which they served.”

(2)

The monument shall be placed on the State Capitol grounds where there are other monuments.

(3)(A)

The monument shall be designed and constructed in the manner recommended by the Hershel Woody Williams Medal of Honor Foundation, or in a manner similar to the design recommended by the Hershel Woody Williams Medal of Honor Foundation.

(B)

The Secretary of State shall approve the design and site selection for the monument through consultation with the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission.

(c)

The Secretary of State may accept gifts, grants, and donations from individuals and organizations, to be deposited as trust funds into the Gold Star Family Memorial Monument Fund.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 281, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 281, § 1, provided:

“Legislative findings. The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The United States has numerous memorials and monuments giving honor to the patriots who have sacrificed and given their lives for our freedom and paying tribute to those who have faithfully served in the United States Armed Forces since the founding of our republic;

“(2)

There is a group of our citizens especially to be honored, the families who have had a loved one who died while serving in the United States Armed Forces to protect our freedom and to give freedom to many who have never experienced it;

“(3)

The Gold Star Family Memorial Monument honors those families who sacrificed more than most of us, and illustrates that the United States has citizens in every community willing to make such sacrifices;

“(4)

The Gold Star Family Memorial Monument further illustrates that families suffer and grieve when a dear relative is lost, and without their sacrifices, freedom could not and would not have been preserved; and

“(5)

The Gold Star Family Memorial Monument is appropriate for the placement on State Capitol grounds as a tribute to all the families who have had a loved one who died while serving in the United States Armed Forces.”